Utah statutes.
53A-19-105.   School district interfund transfers.
(1)  A school district shall spend revenues only within the fund for which
they were originally authorized, levied, collected, or appropriated.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, school district interfund
transfers of residual equity are prohibited.
(3)  The State Board of Education may authorize school district interfund
transfers of residual equity when a district states its intent to create a new
fund or expand, contract, or liquidate an existing fund.
(4)  The State Board of Education may also authorize school district interfund
transfers of residual equity for a financially distressed district if the
board determines the following:
(a)  the district has a significant deficit in its maintenance and operations
fund caused by circumstances not subject to the administrative decisions of
the district;
(b)  the deficit cannot be reasonably reduced under Section 53A-19-104; and
(c)  without the transfer, the school district will not be capable of meeting
statewide educational standards adopted by the State Board of Education.
(5)  The board shall develop standards for defining and aiding financially
distressed school districts under this section in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(6) (a)  All debt service levies not subject to certified tax rate hearings
shall be recorded and reported in the debt service fund.
(b)  Debt service levies under Subsection 59-2-924(3)(e)(iii) that are not
subject to the public hearing provisions of Section 59-2-919 may not be used
for any purpose other than retiring general obligation debt.
(c)  Amounts from these levies remaining in the debt service fund at the end
of a fiscal year shall be used in subsequent years for general obligation debt
retirement.
(d)  Any amounts left in the debt service fund after all general obligation
debt has been retired may be transferred to the capital projects fund upon
completion of the budgetary hearing process required under Section 53A-19-102.
